Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.060

Application for writ—Affidavit.

(1) The plaintiff or someone on plaintiff's behalf shall apply for a writ of attachment by affidavit, alleging that the attachment is not sought and the action is not prosecuted to hinder, delay, or defraud any creditor of the defendant and also alleging that affiant has reason to believe and does believe the following, together with specific facts on which affiant's belief in the allegations is based: (a) That the defendant is indebted to the plaintiff (specifying the nature of the claim and the amount of such indebtedness over and above all just credits and offsets), and (b) that one or more of the grounds stated in RCW 6.25.030 for issuance of a writ of attachment exists.

(2) If the action is based on a debt not due, the ground alleged under subsection (1)(b) of this section must be one stated in RCW 6.25.040 for attachment on a debt not due, and affiant shall also allege reason to believe and belief that nothing but time is wanting to fix an absolute indebtedness due from defendant, together with specific facts on which the affiant's belief in the allegations is based.

[ 1987 c 442 s 806.]